Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1382XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1382XD (3) 91
as/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 904.118 Federal receipts fund.
1. A federal receipts fund is established in the state
treasury under the control of the department. The fund shall
consist of all of the following:
a. All federal moneys received by the department, including
but not limited to moneys received for federally contracted
services, but excluding moneys required to be deposited in the
special fund pursuant to section 8.41.
b. Any other moneys appropriated to or deposited in the
fund.
2. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department
for purposes of the operations of the department and any other
use authorized or required under the federal law or contract
pursuant to which the moneys were paid. This subsection
does not apply to federal moneys the expenditure of which is
otherwise provided for by law, including but not limited to
federal moneys described in section 904.301B, subsection 14.
3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund
that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a
fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for
expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding
section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in
the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate
importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies
retroactively to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, and
ending June 30, 2024.